Utah statutes.
10-8-2.   Appropriations -- Acquisition and disposal of property --
Municipal authority -- Corporate purpose -- Procedure -- Notice of intent to
acquire real property.
(1) (a)  A municipal legislative body may:
(i)  appropriate money for corporate purposes only;
(ii)  provide for payment of debts and expenses of the corporation;
(iii)  subject to Subsections (4) and (5), purchase, receive, hold, sell,
lease, convey, and dispose of real and personal property for the benefit of
the municipality, whether the property is within or without the municipality's
corporate boundaries, if the action is in the public interest and complies
with other law;
(iv)  improve, protect, and do any other thing in relation to this property
that an individual could do; and
(v)  subject to Subsection (2) and after first holding a public hearing,
authorize municipal services or other nonmonetary assistance to be provided to
or waive fees required to be paid by a nonprofit entity, whether or not the
municipality receives consideration in return.
(b)  A municipality may:
(i)  furnish all necessary local public services within the municipality;
(ii)  purchase, hire, construct, own, maintain and operate, or lease public
utilities located and operating within and operated by the municipality; and
(iii)  subject to Subsection (1)(c), acquire by eminent domain, or otherwise,
property located inside or outside the corporate limits of the municipality
and necessary for any of the purposes stated in Subsections (1)(b)(i) and
(ii), subject to restrictions imposed by Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent
Domain, and general law for the protection of other communities.
(c)  Each municipality that intends to acquire property by eminent domain
under Subsection (1)(b) shall, upon the first contact with the owner of the
property sought to be acquired, deliver to the owner a copy of a booklet or
other materials provided by the Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman,
created under Section 13-43-201, dealing with the property owner's rights in
an eminent domain proceeding.
(d)  Subsection (1)(b) may not be construed to diminish any other authority a
municipality may claim to have under the law to acquire by eminent domain
property located inside or outside the municipality.
(2) (a)  Services or assistance provided pursuant to Subsection (1)(a)(v) is
not subject to the provisions of Subsection (3).
(b)  The total amount of services or other nonmonetary assistance provided or
fees waived under Subsection (1)(a)(v) in any given fiscal year may not exceed
1% of the municipality's budget for that fiscal year.
(3)  It is considered a corporate purpose to appropriate money for any purpose
that, in the judgment of the municipal legislative body, provides for the
safety, health, prosperity, moral well-being, peace, order, comfort, or
convenience of the inhabitants of the municipality subject to the following:
(a)  The net value received for any money appropriated shall be measured on a
project-by-project basis over the life of the project.
(b)  The criteria for a determination under this Subsection (3) shall be
established by the municipality's legislative body.  A determination of value
received, made by the municipality's legislative body, shall be presumed valid
unless it can be shown that the determination was arbitrary, capricious, or
illegal.
(c)  The municipality may consider intangible benefits received by the
municipality in determining net value received.
(d) (i)  Prior to the municipal legislative body making any decision to
appropriate any funds for a corporate purpose under this section, a public
hearing shall be held.
(ii)  Notice of the hearing described in Subsection (3)(d)(i) shall be
published:
(A) (I)  in a newspaper of general circulation at least 14 days before the
date of the hearing; or
(II)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation, by posting notice in at
least three conspicuous places within the municipality for the same time
period; and
(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101, at least 14 days before the date of
the hearing.
(e)  A study shall be performed before notice of the public hearing is given
and shall be made available at the municipality for review by interested
parties at least 14 days immediately prior to the public hearing, setting
forth an analysis and demonstrating the purpose for the appropriation.  In
making the study, the following factors shall be considered:
(i)  what identified benefit the municipality will receive in return for any
money or resources appropriated;
(ii)  the municipality's purpose for the appropriation, including an analysis
of the way the appropriation will be used to enhance the safety, health,
prosperity, moral well-being, peace, order, comfort, or convenience of the
inhabitants of the municipality; and
(iii)  whether the appropriation is necessary and appropriate to accomplish
the reasonable goals and objectives of the municipality in the area of
economic development, job creation, affordable housing, blight elimination,
job preservation, the preservation of historic structures and property, and
any other public purpose.
(f) (i)  An appeal may be taken from a final decision of the municipal
legislative body, to make an appropriation.
(ii)  The appeal shall be filed within 30 days after the date of that
decision, to the district court.
(iii)  Any appeal shall be based on the record of the proceedings before the
legislative body.
(iv)  A decision of the municipal legislative body shall be presumed to be
valid unless the appealing party shows that the decision was arbitrary,
capricious, or illegal.
(g)  The provisions of this Subsection (3) apply only to those appropriations
made after May 6, 2002.
(h)  This section applies only to appropriations not otherwise approved
pursuant to Title 10, Chapter 5, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Utah Towns,
or Title 10, Chapter 6, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Utah Cities.
(4) (a)  Before a municipality may dispose of a significant parcel of real
property, the municipality shall:
(i)  provide reasonable notice of the proposed disposition at least 14 days
before the opportunity for public comment under Subsection (4)(a)(ii); and
(ii)  allow an opportunity for public comment on the proposed disposition.
(b)  Each municipality shall, by ordinance, define what constitutes:
(i)  a significant parcel of real property for purposes of Subsection (4)(a);
and
(ii)  reasonable notice for purposes of Subsection (4)(a)(i).
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(d), each municipality intending
to acquire real property for the purpose of expanding the municipality's
infrastructure or other facilities used for providing services that the
municipality offers or intends to offer shall provide written notice, as
provided in this Subsection (5), of its intent to acquire the property if:
(i)  the property is located:
(A)  outside the boundaries of the municipality; and
(B)  in a county of the first or second class; and
(ii)  the intended use of the property is contrary to:
(A)  the anticipated use of the property under the general plan of the county
in whose unincorporated area or the municipality in whose boundaries the
property is located; or
(B)  the property's current zoning designation.
(b)  Each notice under Subsection (5)(a) shall:
(i)  indicate that the municipality intends to acquire real property;
(ii)  identify the real property; and
(iii)  be sent to:
(A)  each county in whose unincorporated area and each municipality in whose
boundaries the property is located; and
(B)  each affected entity.
(c)  A notice under this Subsection (5) is a protected record as provided in
Subsection 63G-2-305(7).
(d) (i)  The notice requirement of Subsection (5)(a) does not apply if the
municipality previously provided notice under Section 10-9a-203 identifying
the general location within the municipality or unincorporated part of the
county where the property to be acquired is located.
(ii)  If a municipality is not required to comply with the notice requirement
of Subsection (5)(a) because of application of Subsection (5)(d)(i), the
municipality shall provide the notice specified in Subsection (5)(a) as soon
as practicable after its acquisition of the real property.
